District of Columbia statutes.
44-1003.12

Exemption.

This subchapter shall not apply to individual transfers, discharges, or relocations of residents who are admitted or committed under Chapter 13 of Title 7.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 312, 33 DCR 1510

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1442.